Georgia, session 2025_26, HB520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
19 SECTION 1.
20 Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to health, is amended in
21 paragraph (2) of Code Section 31-7-131, relating to definitions relative to peer review
22 groups, by striking "and" at the end of subparagraph (L), by replacing the period at the end
23 of subparagraph (M) with "; and", and by adding a new subparagraph to read as follows:
24 "(N) A midwife."
25 SECTION 2.
26 Said title is further amended by repealing in its entirety Chapter 26, relating to the practice
27 of midwifery, and designating said chapter as reserved.
28 SECTION 3.
29 Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to professions and businesses,
30 is amended by adding a new chapter to read as follows:
31 "CHAPTER 24B
32 43-24B-1.
33 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the 'Georgia Licensed Midwife Act.'
34 43-24B-2.
35 (a) The General Assembly finds that:
36 (1) Parents are entitled to freedom in choosing their provider and setting for childbirth;
37 (2) Some potential parents in this state desire alternatives to currently available hospital
38 based maternity care;
H. B. 520
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0511
39 (3) Trained and competent midwifery professionals can enhance health and safety during
40 planned, out-of-hospital births;
41 (4) Midwives are independent, autonomous healthcare providers who are trained in
42 managing normal physiological births in the community setting;
43 (5) Numerous counties in this state are underserved by obstetricians;
44 (6) Midwives can assist women and their families with safe and effective childbirth
45 while guiding the health, safety, and welfare of mothers and their offspring through the
46 childbearing year; and
47 (7) Regulating midwifery promotes access to safe and effective antepartum, intrapartum,
48 and postpartum care.
49 (b) The General Assembly, therefore, declares it to be the purpose of this chapter to protect
50 the health, safety, and welfare of the public by providing for the licensure and regulation
51 of the activities of midwives.
52 43-24B-3.
53 As used in this chapter, the term:
54 (1) 'Advisory board' means the Advisory Board for Licensed Midwives established
55 pursuant to Code Section 43-24B-4.
56 (2) 'Collaboration' means a process by which a licensed midwife and a physician or other
57 appropriate healthcare provider jointly manage the care of a client, the requirements for
58 which shall be defined by the advisory board.
59 (3) 'Consultation' means a communication between a licensed midwife and a physician
60 or appropriate healthcare provider with expertise in providing medical services to women
61 during the prenatal, childbirth, and postpartum periods when assessing a condition during
62 such periods.
63 (4) 'Informed consent' means a written certification by the client consenting to or
64 declining procedures, protocols, and treatments or recommended diagnostic tests after full
H. B. 520
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0511
65 disclosure of the current standard of care and its purpose, benefits, known risks,
66 contraindications, and associated risks, as well as any alternative options.
67 (5) 'License' means a license issued pursuant to this chapter to engage in the practice of
68 midwifery.
69 (6) 'Licensed midwife' or 'licensee' means an individual licensed under this chapter who
70 is engaging in the practice of midwifery.
71 (7) 'Practice of midwifery' means assistance given, in exchange for compensation, to
72 women during pregnancy, birth, and the postpartum period, including well-woman
73 screening and education. Such assistance may be provided in out-of-hospital settings,
74 such as a private home or a birth center. Such assistance, which is provided within a
75 network of relationships with other maternity care providers who may provide
76 consultation and collaboration when needed, includes:
77 (A) Providing care, education, counseling, and support to women and their families
78 throughout pregnancy, birth, and the postpartum period; identifying unique physical
79 social and emotional needs; recognizing abnormal conditions requiring the services of
80 a healthcare provider such as a physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice
81 registered nurse and developing a plan for consultation and referral when such
82 conditions arise; and providing emergency care and support for mothers and babies
83 until additional assistance is available;
84 (B) Ordering prenatal, postpartum, and well-woman laboratory analyses performed by
85 a licensed laboratory for screening purposes; ordering obstetric ultrasounds; obtaining
86 and using appropriate equipment and devices such as a Doppler ultrasound, blood
87 pressure cuff, and phlebotomy supplies, instruments, and sutures; obtaining, carrying,
88 and administering antihemorrhagic agents including but not limited to Pitocin
89 (oxytocin), misoprostol and methergine, intravenous fluids for stabilization of the
90 laboring person, magnesium sulfate, terbutaline, neonatal injectable vitamin K,
91 newborn antibiotic eye prophylaxis, oxygen, intravenous antibiotics for Group B
H. B. 520
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0511
92 Streptococcal antibiotic prophylaxis, Rho(D) immune globulin, local anesthetic,
93 epinephrine, and other drugs or supplies approved by the advisory board; provided,
94 however, that nothing in this subparagraph shall be interpreted to include the
95 prescribing of medications;
96 (C) Managing the postpartum period, including the suturing of an episiotomy and the
97 suturing of first and second degree natural perineal and labial lacerations, including the
98 administration of a local anesthetic;
99 (D) Managing the newborn period, including:
100 (i) Providing care for a newborn baby, including performing a normal newborn baby
101 examination;
102 (ii) Resuscitating a newborn baby; and
103 (iii) Performing newborn screenings;
104 (E) Providing limited interconception services in order to provide continuity of care,
105 including:
106 (i) Breastfeeding support and counseling;
107 (ii) Family planning, limited to natural family planning, cervical caps, and
108 diaphragms; and
109 (iii) Pap smears, where each client with an abnormal result is to be referred to an
110 appropriate licensed healthcare provider; and
111 (F) Executing the orders of a physician, if the orders are within the education,
112 knowledge, and skill of the licensed midwife.
113 (8) 'Qualified instructor' means an individual who:
114 (A) Holds a license under this chapter; or
115 (B) Is a licensed healthcare provider who has at least five years of experience or who
116 has participated in 50 documented births as the primary healthcare provider.
H. B. 520
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0511
117 (9) 'Referral' means a request made by a licensed midwife to a physician or other
118 healthcare provider for an assessment of a mother or her offspring in order to determine
119 appropriate care.
120 43-24B-4.
121 (a) There is created within the division the Advisory Board for Licensed Midwives which
122 shall consist of six members.
123 (b) The Governor shall appoint all members of the advisory board as follows:
124 (1) Four licensed midwives;
125 (2) One physician with experience collaborating in out-of-hospital birth; and
126 (3) One member of the general public who has used the services of a licensed midwife
127 in this state.
128 (c) The members of the advisory board shall serve for terms of two years and may succeed
129 themselves.
130 (d) Any vacancy on the advisory board shall be filled in the same manner as the regular
131 appointments.
132 (e) The Governor may remove members of the advisory board for incompetence, neglect
133 of duty, unprofessional conduct, conviction of any felony, failure to meet the qualifications
134 of this chapter, or committing any act prohibited by this chapter.
135 (f) The advisory board shall elect a chairperson from among its membership and may elect
136 other officers at the discretion of the advisory board, who shall each serve for one year.
137 (g) The advisory board shall meet at least once per year or as otherwise called by the
138 chairperson.
139 43-24B-5.
140 The advisory board shall issue a license to engage in the practice of midwifery to any
141 individual who meets the requirements of this chapter.
H. B. 520
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0511
142 43-24B-6.
143 (a) Each applicant for a license under this chapter shall:
144 (1) Submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
145 (2) Pay an application fee as determined by the advisory board;
146 (3) Furnish to the advisory board a full set of fingerprints to enable a criminal
147 background investigation to be conducted on the applicant so as to determine the
148 applicant's suitability to be a licensed midwife. The advisory board shall submit the
149 applicant's fingerprints to the Georgia Crime Information Center. If no disqualifying
150 record is identified at the state level, the Georgia Crime Information Center is authorized
151 to submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal
152 history check. The Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the advisory board in
153 writing of the results of such criminal background investigation, which shall be used by
154 the advisory board for the exclusive purpose of carrying out its responsibilities under this
155 chapter, shall not be a public record, shall be privileged, and shall not be disclosed to any
156 other person or agency;
157 (4) Hold a current certification in adult cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and
158 neonatal resuscitation from an organization recognized by the advisory board;
159 (5) Provide documentation of successful completion of a pharmacology course approved
160 by the advisory board; and
161 (6) Hold a current certification in good standing from a midwifery organization
162 recognized by the advisory board, such as the North American Registry of Midwives, the
163 American Midwifery Certification Board, or any successor organizations.
164 (b) The advisory board, in its discretion, may issue a license to an applicant who does not
165 meet the requirements of paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section but who:
166 (1) Has received midwifery training, which shall include experience in initial obstetrical
167 exams, prenatal care, births, newborn examinations, and postpartum care, from a
168 qualified instructor for at least three years; participated in at least 50 documented births;
H. B. 520
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0511
169 and achieved a passing score on an examination approved by the advisory board relating
170 to the practice of midwifery;
171 (2) Has been engaged in the practice of midwifery for at least 25 years; or
172 (3) Is licensed to engage in the practice of midwifery in another jurisdiction whose laws,
173 in the opinion of the advisory board, require qualifications and maintain standards
174 substantially the same as those of this state for licensed midwives.
175 43-24B-7.
176 (a) A license issued by the advisory board shall be renewed every two years if the licensee
177 is not in violation of this chapter at the time of application for renewal and has completed
178 20 hours of continuing education approved by the advisory board since the license was
179 issued or last renewed.
180 (b) Each individual licensed under this chapter is responsible for renewing his or her
181 license before the expiration date.
182 43-24B-8.
183 (a) The advisory board may revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to issue or renew a license;
184 place a licensee on probation; or issue a letter of admonition upon proof that the licensee
185 or applicant has:
186 (1) Procured or attempted to procure a license by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation,
187 misleading omission, or material misstatement of fact;
188 (2) Been convicted of a felony or of any crime involving moral turpitude as provided
189 under state law;
190 (3) Willfully or negligently acted in a manner inconsistent with the health or safety of
191 persons under such licensee's care;
H. B. 520
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0511
192 (4) Had a license to practice a business or profession suspended or revoked or has
193 otherwise been subject to discipline related to such licensee's practice of a business or
194 profession in any other jurisdiction;
195 (5) Committed a fraudulent act that materially affects the fitness of the licensee or
196 applicant to practice a business or profession;
197 (6) Excessively or habitually used alcohol or drugs, provided that the advisory board
198 shall not discipline a licensee under this paragraph if such licensee is enrolled in a
199 substance abuse program approved by the advisory board; or
200 (7) A physical or mental disability that renders such licensee incapable of safely
201 engaging in the practice of midwifery.
202 (b) The advisory board is authorized to conduct investigations into allegations of conduct
203 described in subsection (a) of this Code section.
204 (c) In addition to revoking, suspending, denying, or refusing to renew a license, the
205 advisory board may fine a licensee found to have violated any provision of this chapter or
206 any rule adopted by the advisory board under this chapter in an amount of not less than
207 $100.00 nor more than $500.00 for each such violation.
208 (d) The provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,'
209 shall be applicable to the advisory board and the provisions of this chapter.
210 (e) Any person may file a complaint with the advisory board with respect to a licensed
211 midwife.
212 43-24B-9.
213 (a) The advisory board may promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to carry out
214 the provisions of this chapter.
215 (b) The advisory board may act as a facilitator of the state-wide dissemination of
216 information concerning the practice of midwifery and the services of licensed midwives.
H. B. 520
- 9 -

25 LC 55 0511
217 43-24B-10.
218 (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, no person shall engage in the
219 practice of midwifery in this state unless such person holds a license issued by the advisory
220 board pursuant to Code Section 43-24B-5.
221 (b) A person may engage in the practice of midwifery in this state without a license if:
222 (1) The person is a licensed healthcare practitioner and the services provided are within
223 the scope of the person's license; or
224 (2)(A) The person does not advertise that the person is a licensed midwife; and
225 (B) The person discloses the following to each client on an informed disclosure
226 document that is signed by the client:
227 (i) That the person does not possess a license to engage in the practice of midwifery
228 in this state;
229 (ii) That the person's education and qualifications have not been reviewed by the
230 state;
231 (iii) That the person is not authorized to carry and administer potentially life-saving
232 medications;
233 (iv) A plan for transporting the client to the hospital if a problem arises during labor
234 or childbirth; and
235 (v) That the client will not have recourse through a complaint process conducted by
236 a professional licensing board.
237 (c) Any individual engaging in the practice of midwifery without a license in violation of
238 this Code section shall be subject to a fine of not less than $100.00 nor more than $500.00
239 for each such violation.
H. B. 520
- 10 -

25 LC 55 0511
240 43-24B-11.
241 (a) Prior to engaging in the practice of midwifery with a client, a licensed midwife shall
242 obtain informed consent from such client and retain a copy of such informed consent for
243 at least four years.
244 (b) A licensed midwife shall be authorized to file a birth certificate for each birth that such
245 licensed midwife provides services in connection with in accordance with the laws of this
246 state.
247 43-24B-12.
248 A licensed midwife shall:
249 (1) Limit his or her practice to pregnancy, labor, delivery, and postpartum, newborn, and
250 interconception care that is not a pharmacologically induced labor and in which the infant
251 is born spontaneously between 37 and 43 completed weeks of gestation; provided,
252 however, that the limitation contained in this paragraph shall not prohibit a licensed
253 midwife from delivering an infant when there is intrauterine fetal demise or a fetal
254 anomaly incompatible with life; and
255 (2) Appropriately recommend and facilitate consultation or collaboration with or referral
256 or transfer of care to a licensed healthcare professional when the circumstances require
257 such action in accordance with this chapter and standards established by advisory board
258 rule.
259 43-24B-13.
260 (a) If, after a client has been informed that she has or may have a condition indicating the
261 need for medical consultation, collaboration, referral, or transfer, and the client declines a
262 referral or transfer of care, the licensed midwife shall:
263 (1) Terminate care in accordance with procedures established by advisory board rule; or
H. B. 520
- 11 -

25 LC 55 0511
264 (2) Continue to provide care for the client if the client signs an informed consent waiver
265 of medical consultation, collaboration, referral, or transfer. A licensed midwife shall not
266 be held liable when such informed consent waiver is signed.
267 (b) If, after a client has been informed that she has or may have a condition indicating the
268 need for immediate transfer, and the client declines such transfer, the licensed midwife
269 shall, in accordance with procedures established by advisory board rule, terminate the care
270 or initiate transfer by:
271 (1) Calling 9-1-1 and reporting the need for immediate transfer;
272 (2) Immediately transporting the client by private vehicle to the receiving provider; or
273 (3) Contacting the physician to whom the client will be transferred and following such
274 physician's orders.
275 (c) The standards for consultation and transfer provided in this Code section represent the
276 minimum requirements that a licensed midwife must adhere to. A licensed midwife shall
277 initiate consultation or collaboration with or referral or transfer of a client to a licensed
278 healthcare provider or facility at an earlier stage than mandated by administrative rule if,
279 based on the licensed midwife's professional judgment and experience, the health status of
280 the mother or infant necessitates such action.
281 43-24B-14.
282 (a) If a licensed midwife initiates consultation or collaboration with or the referral or
283 transfer of a client to a licensed healthcare provider or facility, the responsibility of the
284 provider or facility for the client shall not begin until the client is physically within the care
285 of such provider or facility.
286 (b) A licensed healthcare provider who examines a licensed midwife's client shall only be
287 liable for the actual examination and shall not be held accountable for the client's decision
288 to pursue an out-of-hospital birth or the services of a licensed midwife.
H. B. 520
- 12 -

25 LC 55 0511
289 (c)(1) A licensed healthcare provider may, upon receiving a briefing or data from a
290 licensed midwife, issue a medical order for the licensed midwife's client, without that
291 client being an explicit patient of such provider.
292 (2) Regardless of the advice given or order issued, the responsibility and liability for
293 caring for the client shall be that of the licensed midwife.
294 (3) The provider giving the order shall be responsible and liable only for the
295 appropriateness of the order, given the briefing or data received.
296 (4) The issuing of an order for a licensed midwife's client shall not constitute a
297 delegation of duties from the other provider to the licensed midwife.
298 (d) A licensed midwife shall be solely responsible for the administration of medications
299 by such licensed midwife as authorized under this chapter.
300 43-24B-15.
301 A licensed midwife shall not be authorized to:
302 (1) Administer a prescription drug to a client in a manner that violates this chapter;
303 (2) Effect any type of surgical delivery except for the cutting of an emergency
304 episiotomy;
305 (3) Administer any type of epidural, spinal, or caudal anesthetic or any type of narcotic
306 analgesic; or
307 (4) Use forceps or a vacuum extractor.
308 43-24B-16.
309 Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge or limit in any way the right of a
310 parent or parents to deliver a fetus where, when, how, and with whom they choose.
311 43-24B-17.
312 (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent:
H. B. 520
- 13 -

25 LC 55 0511
313 (1) Any licensed healthcare professional from engaging in the authorized scope of
314 practice of his or her profession;
315 (2) Members of a pregnant woman's family from providing incidental care;
316 (3) Representatives of a pregnant woman's culture from providing care consistent with
317 the tenets or practices of such culture or representatives of a pregnant woman's religion
318 from providing care consistent with practices of such religion; provided, however, that
319 such representatives shall not hold themselves out as licensed midwives unless such
320 representatives are licensed under this chapter; or
321 (4) Precepted apprentices, student midwives, and midwifery assistants from providing
322 midwifery services under the supervision and in the physical presence of a licensed
323 midwife.
324 (b) The practice of midwifery shall not constitute the practice of medicine in this state.
325 (c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to change the regulation of physicians as
326 provided for in the laws of this state.
327 43-24B-18.
328 Any health insurance policy, health maintenance organization plan, or other form of health
329 insurance coverage, including Medicaid, that covers maternity care shall not deny coverage
330 for maternity care provided by a licensed midwife in any setting and shall reimburse
331 maternity care by a licensed midwife at the same rate as for other providers of maternity
332 care covered by the policy, plan, or coverage.
333 43-24B-19.
334 Any violation of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter
335 is declared to be a public nuisance subject to abatement as provided in Code Section
336 31-5-9."
H. B. 520
- 14 -

25 LC 55 0511
337 SECTION 4.
338 Said title is further amended in subsection (a) of Code Section 43-26-12, relating to
339 exceptions to the operation of the "Georgia Registered Professional Nurse Practice Act," by
340 striking "and" at the end of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (9), by replacing the period at the
341 end of paragraph (10) with "; and", and by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
342 "(11) The practice of midwifery by a licensed midwife pursuant to Chapter 24B of this
343 title."
344 SECTION 5.
345 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
346 without such approval.
347 SECTION 6.
348 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 520
- 15 -